zh-CN: 安全带样式: 沙滩裤款; 胸式/背心式; 混合式; 儿童款; 坐式; 腰式; 翼形腰带; 女式专用; 其他
ro-RO: Stilul hamului: Pantaloni de surf (boardshorts); Piept/vestă; Hibrid; Copii; Șezut; Talie; Centură wing; Specific pentru femei; Altele
pt-PT: Estilo de arnês: Calções de banho; Peito/colete; Híbrido; Criança; Cadeirinha; Cintura; Cinto Wing; Específico para senhora; Outro
it: Stile imbracatura: Boardshort; Petto/gilet; Ibrido; Bambini; A seggiolino; A fascia; Cintura wing; Da donna; Altro
fi: Valjaiden tyyli: Lautailushortsi; Rinta/liivi; Hybridi; Lasten; Istuma; Vyötärö; Siipivyö; Naisten malli; Muu
sv: Selestil: Boardshorts; Bröst/väst; Hybrid; Barn; Sittsele; Midjesele; Vingbälte; Damspecifik; Övrigt
nl: Harnas stijl: Boardshort; Borst/vest; Hybride; Kinderen; Zit; Heup; Wing-riem; Specifiek voor vrouwen; Overig
vi: Kiểu đai: Quần đùi; Ngực/Áo ghi-lê; Lai; Trẻ em; Đai ngồi; Đai thắt lưng; Đai cánh; Dành riêng cho nữ; Khác
pt-BR: Estilo do trapézio: Boardshort; Peitoral/Colete; Híbrido; Infantil; Assento; Cintura; Cinto para wing; Específico para mulheres; Outro
cs: Styl postroje: Boardshort; Hrudní/vesta; Hybridní; Dětský; Sedací; Bederní; Wing belt; Dámský; Jiné
hr-HR: Stil pojasa: Kratke hlače (boardshort); Prsa / prsluk; Hibrid; Dječje; Sjedeći; Za struk; Pojas s krilima; Posebno za žene; Ostalo
sk-SK: Štýl postroja: Boardshort; Hrudník/vesta; Hybridný; Detský; Sedací; Pásový; Wing belt; Špeciálne pre ženy; Iné
en: Harness style: Boardshort; Chest/Vest; Hybrid; Kids; Seat; Waist; Wing belt; Women's specific; Other
sl-SI: Slog trapeza: Kopalne hlače (Boardshort); Prsni koš/telovnik; Hibrid; Otroški; Sedežni; Pasni; Pas s krilci; Ženski; Drugo
th: สไตล์สายรัด: กางเกงเซิร์ฟ; หน้าอก/เสื้อกั๊ก; ไฮบริด; เด็ก; แบบที่นั่ง; เอว; เข็มขัดแบบมีปีก; สำหรับผู้หญิงโดยเฉพาะ; อื่นๆ
pl: Styl uprzęży: Szorty; Klatka piersiowa/Kamizelka; Hybrydowy; Dziecięcy; Siedzeniowy; Taliowy; Pas do wingfoila; Damski; Inny
hu: Hám stílusa: Boardshort; Mellkas / mellény; Hibrid; Gyerek; Beülős; Derék; Wing öv; Női specifikus; Egyéb
lt-LT: Diržo stilius: Maudymosi šortų tipo; Krūtinės / liemenės; Hibridinis; Vaikiškas; Sėdimas; Juosmens; Sparnų diržas; Moteriškas; Kita
da: Type af sele: Boardshorts; Bryst/vest; Hybrid; Børn; Sæde; Talje; Wing-bælte; Specifikt til kvinder; Andet
de: Stil des Gurts: Boardshorts; Brust/Weste; Hybrid; Kinder; Sitzgurt; Hüftgurt; Wing-Gürtel; Speziell für Damen; Sonstige
el: Στυλ ζώνης: Boardshort; Στήθος/Γιλέκο; Υβριδικό; Παιδικό; Καθίσματος; Μέσης; Ζώνη wing; Ειδικό για γυναίκες; Άλλο
bg-BG: Стил на хамута: Шорти за сърф; Гърди/жилетка; Хибрид; Детски; Седалка; Талия; Колан с крила; Специално за жени; Друго
zh-TW: 安全帶樣式: 衝浪褲式; 胸前/背心式; 混合式; 兒童; 座椅式; 腰部式; 飛翼腰帶; 女性專用; 其他
ko: 하네스 스타일: 보드쇼츠; 가슴/조끼; 하이브리드; 아동용; 시트; 웨이스트; 윙 벨트; 여성 전용; 기타
es: Estilo del arnés: Boardshort; Pecho/chaleco; Híbrido; Infantil; Asiento; Cintura; Cinturón de wing; Específico para mujer; Otro
nb: Selestil: Boardshort; Bryst / vest; Hybrid; Barn; Sete; Midje; Vingebelte; Kvinnespesifikk; Annet
tr: Koşum takımı stili: Boardshort; Göğüs/Yelek; Hibrit; Çocuk; Oturak; Bel; Kanat kemeri; Kadınlara özel; Diğer
ru: Тип страховочной системы: Бордшорты; Нагрудная/жилет; Гибридная; Детская; Сидячая; Поясная; Пояс для винга; Специально для женщин; Другое
ja: ハーネススタイル: ボードショーツ; チェスト/ベスト; ハイブリッド; キッズ; シート; ウエスト; ウィングベルト; レディース用; その他
fr: Style de harnais: Short de bain; Buste/gilet; Hybride; Enfant; Culotte; Ceinture; Ceinture pour wing; Spécifique pour femmes; Autre